Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3819
Corporation; advancement of funds; repayment; conditions.

Any person may advance to a corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 on a contingent liability base such funds as are necessary for the purposes of its business or to enable it to comply with any requirements of sections 44-3801 to 44-3826. Such money and interest thereon as may have been agreed upon shall be repayable but shall be repaid only on prior approval by the director. Repayment shall only be made out of operating surplus after reserve requirements have been met. No assessments against members may be levied for the purpose of repayment and no dividends may be paid to members or shareholders as long as interest or repayment installments remain unpaid.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 19.